build/hi_desktop/engnum.lexc
!!!engnum.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Num +Npref+
+Npref1+ +Npref2+ +Npref3+ +Npref4+
+Npref5+ +Npref6+ +Npref7+ +Npref8+
+Npref9+ +Npref1nn+ +Npref1nnn+
+Npref1n+ +Npref2n+ +Npref3n+ +Npref4n+
+Npref5n+ +Npref6n+ +Npref7n+ +Npref8n+
+Npref9n+ +Nom +Ord

LEXICON Root

NumPref;

LEXICON Num
one	NumSuffix;
two	NumSuffix;
three	NumSuffix;
four	NumSuffix;
five	NumSuffix;
six	NumSuffix;
seven	NumSuffix;
eight	NumSuffix;
nine	NumSuffix;
one[stem]+Num+Ord:first #;
two[stem]+Num+Ord:second #;
three[stem]+Num+Ord:third #;
four[stem]+Num+Ord:fourth #;
five[stem]+Num+Ord:fifth #;
six[stem]+Num+Ord:sixth #;
seven[stem]+Num+Ord:seventh #;
eight[stem]+Num+Ord:eighth #;
nine[stem]+Num+Ord:ninth #;

LEXICON Num1
ten 		Num1Suffix;
one:eleven	Num1Suffix;
two:twelve	Num1Suffix;
three:thirteen	Num1Suffix;
four:fourteen	Num1Suffix;
five:fifteen	Num1Suffix;
six:sixteen	Num1Suffix;
seven:seventeen	Num1Suffix;
eight:eighteen	Num1Suffix;
nine:nineteen	Num1Suffix;
Num1Suffix;

LEXICON NumPref

zero:zero Num1Suffix;
Num;
+Npref1n+:0 Num1;
+Npref2n+:twenty- Num;
+Npref3n+:thirty- Num;
+Npref4n+:fourty Num;
+Npref5n+:fifty- Num;
+Npref6n+:sixty- Num;
+Npref7n+:seventy- Num;
+Npref8n+:eighty- Num;
+Npref9n+:ninety- Num;
+Npref2n+twenty:twenty Num1Suffix;
+Npref3n+thirty:thirty Num1Suffix;
+Npref4n+fourty:fourty Num1Suffix;
+Npref5n+fifty:fifty Num1Suffix;
+Npref6n+sixty:sixty Num1Suffix;
+Npref7n+seventy:seventy Num1Suffix;
+Npref8n+eighty:eighty Num1Suffix;
+Npref9n+ninety:ninety Num1Suffix;

Lexicon NumSuffix
[stem]+Num:0 Nom;

Lexicon Num1Suffix
two[stem]+Num+Ord:twelfth #;
[stem]+Num:^th Ord;
[stem]+Num:0 Nom;

Lexicon Nom
+Nom:0 #;

Lexicon Ord
+Ord:0 #;
